District of Columbia statutes.
1-207.15

Pending actions and proceedings.

(a)

No suit, action, or other judicial proceeding lawfully commenced by or against any officer or agency in his or its official capacity or in relation to the exercise of his or its official functions, shall abate by reason of the taking effect of any provision of this chapter; but the court, unless it determines that the survival of such suit, action, or other proceedings is not necessary for purposes of settlement of the questions involved, shall allow the same to be maintained, with such substitutions as to parties as are appropriate.

(b)

No administrative action or proceeding lawfully commenced shall abate solely by reason of the taking effect of any provision of this chapter, but such action or proceeding shall be continued with such substitutions as to parties and officers or agencies as are appropriate.

History

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 779, Pub. L. 93-198, title VII, § 715

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-207.71.